test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-ngaedarasjTS_gt-norm.yaml
  Verb - хось: # Verb 'to send / lähettää' - full paradigm - Type 1, transitive
  #_[5-B-tr]_ŋædara-_’lähettää’_TV_=_ODD-SYLL_a-vartalo_[MDTN-koodit_a,_ya]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Ger: [ӈэдара, ӈэдарась]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+GerFin: ӈэдараванзь
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Nom+Abs: ӈэдарава
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Acc+Abs: ӈэдаравам’
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Gen+Abs: ӈэдарава’
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Dat+Abs: ӈэдараван’
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Loc+Abs: ӈэдаравахана
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Abl+Abs: ӈэдаравахад
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Pros+Abs: ӈэдарававна
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Nom+Abs: ӈэдараваха’
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Acc+Abs: ӈэдараваха’
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Gen+Abs: ӈэдараваха’
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Nom+Abs: ӈэдарава”
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Acc+Abs: ӈэдараби
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Gen+Abs: ӈэдараби”
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Dat+Abs: ӈэдараваха”
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Loc+Abs: ӈэдараваха”на
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Abl+Abs: ӈэдаравахат
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Pros+Abs: ӈэдараби”мана
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: [ӈэдаравав, ӈэдаравами]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: [ӈэдаравав, ӈэдаравами]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: [ӈэдараван, ӈэдаравани]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: [ӈэдаравахан, ӈэдаравахани]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: [ӈэдараваханан, ӈэдараваханани]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Abl+PxSg1: [ӈэдаравахадан, ӈэдаравахадани, ӈэдаравахадни]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Pros+PxSg1: [ӈэдарававнан, ӈэдарававнани]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Nom+PxSg1: [ӈэдаравахаюн, ӈэдаравахаюни]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Acc+PxSg1: [ӈэдаравахаюн, ӈэдаравахаюни]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Gen+PxSg1: [ӈэдаравахаюн, ӈэдаравахаюни]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: [ӈэдарабин, ӈэдарабини]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Acc+PxSg1: [ӈэдарабин, ӈэдарабини]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: [ӈэдараби”н, ӈэдараби”ни]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Dat+PxSg1: [ӈэдараваха”н, ӈэдараваха”ни]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Loc+PxSg1: [ӈэдараваха”нан, ӈэдараваха”нани]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Abl+PxSg1: [ӈэдаравахатан, ӈэдаравахатани, ӈэдаравахатни]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Pros+PxSg1: [ӈэдараби”манан, ӈэдараби”манани]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: ӈэдаравар
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Acc+PxSg2: ӈэдаравамд
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: ӈэдараванд
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Dat+PxSg2: ӈэдараваханд
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: ӈэдаравахананд
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Abl+PxSg2: ӈэдаравахаданд
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Pros+PxSg2: ӈэдарававнанд
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Nom+PxSg2: ӈэдаравахаюд
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Acc+PxSg2: ӈэдаравахаюд
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Gen+PxSg2: ӈэдаравахают
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: ӈэдарабид
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Acc+PxSg2: ӈэдарабид
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: ӈэдарабит
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Dat+PxSg2: ӈэдаравахат
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Loc+PxSg2: ӈэдараваха”нат
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Abl+PxSg2: ӈэдаравахатат
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Pros+PxSg2: ӈэдараби”манат
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: ӈэдаравада
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Acc+PxSg3: ӈэдаравамда
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: ӈэдараванда
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Dat+PxSg3: ӈэдараваханда
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Loc+PxSg3: ӈэдаравахананда
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Abl+PxSg3: ӈэдаравахаданда
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Pros+PxSg3: ӈэдарававнанда
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Nom+PxSg3: ӈэдаравахаюда
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Acc+PxSg3: ӈэдаравахаюда
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Gen+PxSg3: ӈэдаравахаюта
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: ӈэдарабида
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Acc+PxSg3: ӈэдарабида
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: ӈэдарабита
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Dat+PxSg3: ӈэдаравахата
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Loc+PxSg3: ӈэдараваха”ната
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Abl+PxSg3: [ӈэдаравахатата, ӈэдаравахатта]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Pros+PxSg3: ӈэдараби”маната
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Nom+PxDu1: ӈэдаравами’
#     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Nom+PxSg1.2: ӈэдаравами
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Acc+PxDu1: ӈэдаравами’
#     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Acc+PxSg1.2: ӈэдаравами
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: ӈэдаравани’
#     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Gen+PxSg1.2: ӈэдаравани
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Dat+PxDu1: ӈэдаравахани’
#     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Dat+PxSg1.2: ӈэдаравахани
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Loc+PxDu1: ӈэдараваханани’
#     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Loc+PxSg1.2: ӈэдараваханани
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Abl+PxDu1: [ӈэдаравахадани’, ӈэдаравахадни’]
#     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Abl+PxSg1.2: [ӈэдаравахадани, ӈэдаравахадни]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Pros+PxDu1: ӈэдарававнани’
#     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Pros+PxSg1.2: ӈэдарававнани
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Nom+PxDu1: ӈэдаравахаюни’
#     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Nom+PxSg1.2: ӈэдаравахаюни
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Acc+PxDu1: ӈэдаравахаюни’
#     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Acc+PxSg1.2: ӈэдаравахаюни
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Gen+PxDu1: ӈэдаравахаюни’
#     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Gen+PxSg1.2: ӈэдаравахаюни
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Nom+PxDu1: ӈэдарабини’
#     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Nom+PxSg1.2: ӈэдарабини
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Acc+PxDu1: ӈэдарабини’
#     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Acc+PxSg1.2: ӈэдарабини
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Gen+PxDu1: ӈэдараби”ни’
#     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Gen+PxSg1.2: ӈэдараби”ни
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Dat+PxDu1: ӈэдараваха”ни’
#     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Dat+PxSg1.2: ӈэдараваха”ни
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Loc+PxDu1: ӈэдараваха”нани’
#     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Loc+PxSg1.2: ӈэдараваха”нани
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Abl+PxDu1: [ӈэдаравахатани’, ӈэдаравахатни’]
#     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Abl+PxSg1.2: [ӈэдаравахатани, ӈэдаравахатни]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Pros+PxDu1: ӈэдараби”манани’
#     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Pros+PxSg1.2: ӈэдараби”манани
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Nom+PxDu2: ӈэдаравари’
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Acc+PxDu2: ӈэдаравамди’
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Gen+PxDu2: ӈэдараванди’
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Dat+PxDu2: ӈэдараваханди’
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Loc+PxDu2: ӈэдаравахананди’
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Abl+PxDu2: ӈэдаравахаданди’
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Pros+PxDu2: ӈэдарававнанди’
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Nom+PxDu2: ӈэдаравахаюди’
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Acc+PxDu2: ӈэдаравахаюди’
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Gen+PxDu2: ӈэдаравахаюти’
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Nom+PxDu2: ӈэдарабиди’
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Acc+PxDu2: ӈэдарабиди’
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Gen+PxDu2: ӈэдарабити’
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Dat+PxDu2: ӈэдаравахати’
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Loc+PxDu2: ӈэдараваха”нати’
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Abl+PxDu2: [ӈэдаравахатати’, ӈэдаравахатти’]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Pros+PxDu2: ӈэдараби”манати’
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Nom+PxDu3: ӈэдаравади’
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Acc+PxDu3: ӈэдаравамди’
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Gen+PxDu3: ӈэдараванди’
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Dat+PxDu3: ӈэдараваханди’
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Loc+PxDu3: ӈэдаравахананди’
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Abl+PxDu3: ӈэдаравахаданди’
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Pros+PxDu3: ӈэдарававнанди’
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Nom+PxDu3: ӈэдаравахаюди’
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Acc+PxDu3: ӈэдаравахаюди’
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Gen+PxDu3: ӈэдаравахаюти’
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Nom+PxDu3: ӈэдарабиди’
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Acc+PxDu3: ӈэдарабиди’
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Gen+PxDu3: ӈэдарабити’
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Dat+PxDu3: ӈэдаравахати’
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Loc+PxDu3: ӈэдараваха”нати’
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Abl+PxDu3: [ӈэдаравахатати’, ӈэдаравахатти’]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Pros+PxDu3: ӈэдараби”манати’
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: ӈэдаравава”
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Acc+PxPl1: ӈэдаравава”
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Gen+PxPl1: ӈэдаравана”
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Dat+PxPl1: ӈэдаравахана”
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Loc+PxPl1: ӈэдараваханана”
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Abl+PxPl1: [ӈэдаравахадана”, ӈэдаравахадна”]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Pros+PxPl1: ӈэдарававнана”
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Nom+PxPl1: ӈэдаравахаюна”
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Acc+PxPl1: ӈэдаравахаюна”
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Gen+PxPl1: ӈэдаравахаюна”
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Nom+PxPl1: ӈэдарабина”
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Acc+PxPl1: ӈэдарабина”
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Gen+PxPl1: ӈэдараби”на”
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Dat+PxPl1: ӈэдараваха”на”
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Loc+PxPl1: ӈэдараваха”нана”
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Abl+PxPl1: [ӈэдаравахатана”, ӈэдаравахатна”]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Pros+PxPl1: ӈэдараби”манана”
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: ӈэдаравара”
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Acc+PxPl2: ӈэдаравамда”
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Gen+PxPl2: ӈэдараванда”
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Dat+PxPl2: ӈэдараваханда”
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Loc+PxPl2: ӈэдаравахананда”
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Abl+PxPl2: ӈэдаравахаданда”
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Pros+PxPl2: ӈэдарававнанда”
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Nom+PxPl2: ӈэдаравахаюда”
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Acc+PxPl2: ӈэдаравахаюда”
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Gen+PxPl2: ӈэдаравахаюта”
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Nom+PxPl2: ӈэдарабида”
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Acc+PxPl2: ӈэдарабида”
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Gen+PxPl2: ӈэдарабита”
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Dat+PxPl2: ӈэдаравахата”
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Loc+PxPl2: ӈэдараваха”ната”
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Abl+PxPl2: [ӈэдаравахатата”, ӈэдаравахатта”]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Pros+PxPl2: ӈэдараби”маната”
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: ӈэдаравадо’
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Acc+PxPl3: ӈэдаравамдо’
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Gen+PxPl3: ӈэдаравандо’
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Dat+PxPl3: ӈэдаравахандо’
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Loc+PxPl3: ӈэдараваханандо’
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Abl+PxPl3: ӈэдаравахадандо’
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Pros+PxPl3: ӈэдарававнандо’
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Nom+PxPl3: ӈэдаравахаюдо’
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Acc+PxPl3: ӈэдаравахаюдо’
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Gen+PxPl3: ӈэдаравахаюто’
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Nom+PxPl3: ӈэдарабидо’
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Acc+PxPl3: ӈэдарабидо’
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Gen+PxPl3: ӈэдарабито’
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Dat+PxPl3: ӈэдаравахато’
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Loc+PxPl3: ӈэдараваха”нато’
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Abl+PxPl3: [ӈэдаравахатато’, ӈэдаравахатто’]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Pros+PxPl3: ӈэдараби”манато’
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pred+Abs: ӈэдаравад
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pred+Nom+PxSg1: [ӈэдаравадав, ӈэдаравадув, ӈэдаравадами]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pred+Acc+PxSg1: [ӈэдаравадав, ӈэдаравадув, ӈэдаравадами]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pred+Gen+PxSg1: [ӈэдаравадан, ӈэдаравадани]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pred+Nom+PxSg2: ӈэдаравадар
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pred+Acc+PxSg2: ӈэдаравадамд
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pred+Gen+PxSg2: ӈэдараваданд
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pred+Nom+PxSg3: ӈэдаравадада
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pred+Acc+PxSg3: ӈэдаравадамда
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pred+Gen+PxSg3: ӈэдараваданда
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pred+Nom+PxDu1: ӈэдаравадами’
#     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pred+Nom+PxSg1.2: ӈэдаравадами
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pred+Acc+PxDu1: ӈэдаравадами’
